Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1613
Qualified industry organization, defined.

Qualified industry organization means any organization or industry trade association the members of which are engaged in the sale or distribution of odorized propane to the ultimate consumer or the sale of propane utilization equipment to the ultimate consumer.

Laws 1998, LB 699, § 13.